Nebraska, session 109, LB237.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB237 LB237
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 32-960, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
32-960 (1) The election commissioner or In any county with less than
ten thousand inhabitants, the county clerk may apply to the Secretary of
State to mail ballots for all elections held after approval of the
application to registered voters of any or all of the precincts in the
county. The application shall include a written plan for the conduct of
the election which complies with this section, including a timetable for
the conduct of the election and provisions for the notice of election to
be published and for the application for ballots for early voting
notwithstanding other statutory provisions regarding the content and
publication of a notice of election or the application for ballots for
early voting. If the Secretary of State approves such application for one
or more precincts in the county, the election commissioner or county
clerk shall follow the applicable procedures in sections 32-953 to 32-959
for conducting elections by mail, except that the deadline for receipt of
the ballots shall be the deadline specified in subsection (2) of section
32-908.
(2) The election commissioner or county clerk of a county that has
an approved application pursuant to subsection (1) of this section:
(a) Shall allow a voter to return the ballot by hand-delivering it
to the office of the election commissioner or county clerk;
(b) Shall maintain at least one secure ballot drop-box available for
voters to deposit completed ballots twenty-four hours per day, starting
at least ten days before the election through the deadline provided in
subsection (1) of this section for the receipt of ballots;
(c) Shall maintain at least one in-person voting location at the
office of the election commissioner or county clerk at which a voter in a
precinct subject to a plan under this section approved by the Secretary
of State may receive and cast a ballot which shall be open on the day of
the election from the time for opening the polls pursuant to section
-2-

LB237 LB237
2025 2025
32-908 through the deadline provided in subsection (1) of this section
for the receipt of ballots;
(d) Shall maintain in-person early voting opportunities as described
in section 32-942; and
(e) May provide additional secure ballot drop-boxes and in-person
voting locations that need not be open according to the requirements of
subdivisions (b) and (c) of this subsection.
Sec. 2. Original section 32-960, Revised Statutes Cumulative
Supplement, 2024, is repealed.
-3-